test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-PROG-yi-tsazid_wake-up.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - ts'ázid[wake-up] :
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Prog+SbjSg1:       ts'áyissił
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Prog+SbjSg2:       ts'áyíził
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Prog+SbjSg3:       ts'áyiził
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Prog+SbjPl1:       [ts'áyiìził, ts'áyaàził]
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Prog+SbjPl1+Distr: [ts'ádàyiìził, ts'ádàyaàził]
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Prog+SbjPl2:       ts'áyassił
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Prog+SbjPl2+Distr: ts'ádàyassił
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Prog+SbjPl3:       ts'ágáził
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Prog+SbjPl3+Distr: ts'ádàgáził
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Prog+SbjSg4:       ts'áts'áził
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Prog+SbjSg4+Distr: ts'ádàts'áził
